Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SHORT TITLE.new text end new text begin This act may be known as the "mRNA Bioweapons Prohibition Act." new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [609.7121] MRNA BIOWEAPONS PROHIBITION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Legislative intent. new text end new text begin It is the intent of the legislature to designate mRNA injections and products as weapons of mass destruction according to section 609.712 and to prohibit possession or distribution of the mRNA injections and products in the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "mRNA injections and products" means: new text end new text begin (1) with regards to the COVID injections, mRNA or "modified" messenger RNA as related to the gene altering agents. The structure was altered by substituting two N-methyl-pseudouridine amino acids for the usual uridine components so as to elude immune destruction of the mRNA, which then allows the mRNA that produces the pathogenic Spike protein to exist within cells for a longer period of time; new text end new text begin (2) all injections or products containing mRNA or "modified" messenger RNA; new text end new text begin (3) any human gene therapy product for any infectious disease indication, regardless of whether the administration is termed an immunization, vaccine, or any other term; or new text end new text begin (4) nanotechnology or nanoparticles that alter genes and create a biosynthetic cell replication. new text end new text begin For the purposes of this section, mRNA does not mean naturally occurring mRNA defined as messenger ribonucleic acid that is a single-stranded molecule of RNA that corresponds to the genetic sequence of a gene. new text end new text begin (c) "State or local government official" means the governor, attorney general, state attorneys, county sheriffs, and other state and local law enforcement. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Crime. new text end new text begin Whoever knowingly manufactures, acquires, possesses, or makes readily accessible to another mRNA injections and products is guilty of a crime and may be sentenced as provided under section 609.712. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin State or local government official. new text end new text begin A state or local government official must use all lawful means necessary to enforce this section. A state or local government official who does not enforce or investigate a violation under subdivision 3 when provided with reasonable evidence of a violation is guilty of a crime and subject to the same penalties as a person violating that subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Civil action. new text end new text begin A resident of the state may seek injunctive relief, declaratory relief, and monetary damages from the state or a state and local government official for lack of enforcement of this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end